Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5641.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 10-16-4, 10-16-9 and 10-16-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 10-
16 entitled "Small Claims and Consumer Claims" are hereby amended to read as follows:
10-16-4. Filing fee — Waiver of appeal.
(a) The plaintiff shall pay into the court an entry fee of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) seventy-
five dollars ($75.00), inclusive of a civil case processing fee and a technology surcharge assessed
in accordance with § 8-15-11, and of which twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be placed in a “small
claims mediation restricted-receipt account” together with an amount equal to the then-prevailing
postal rate, for mailing notices in the case, which shall be deemed the beginning of the action. The
“small claims mediation restricted-receipt account” shall be established under the control of the
state court director of finance; the chief judge of the district court shall be authorized to pay for the
services of qualified mediators and other related expenses from the “small claims mediation
restricted-receipt account.” In addition to the entry fee, the court shall apply a technology surcharge
in accordance with § 8-15-11.
(b) The plaintiff shall also file with his or her any claim a written waiver of right of appeal.
(c) The defendant shall file with any compulsory counterclaim a written waiver of the right
to appeal the counterclaim only.
10-16-9. Filing of defense — Counterclaim.
Prior to or upon the date set for answering the defendant shall in writing file in court his or

her answer or defense to the plaintiff’s claim and may claim any compulsory counterclaim he or
she may have against the plaintiff’s claim, as he or she might plead the claim in an action begun by
complaint and summons, and shall file a statement in writing of his or her compulsory counterclaim
with the court, and the court shall determine which of the parties is entitled to decision against the
other, and in what amount, and enter decision accordingly, but not exceeding the sum of two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) five thousand dollars ($5,000). If the defendant’s
counterclaim shall exceed the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) five thousand
dollars ($5,000), and in the opinion of the court there shall be due the defendant thereon an amount
greater than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) five thousand dollars ($5,000), the court
shall enter decision against the plaintiff as in case of nonsuit, and for the defendant for his or her
costs only, and shall not further adjudicate upon the claim of the defendant, whose right to sue for
the claim shall remain in the same manner as before the commencement of the action. The court
may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.
10-16-14. Appeals by defendant Appeals.
(a) The defendant, if aggrieved by the decision of the district court in a cause brought under
the provisions of this chapter, shall have the same right of appeal, and under the same terms and
conditions, as are provided under the practice in ordinary civil actions in district courts. The
defendant shall, at the time of claiming the appeal, pay a seventy-five dollar ($75.00) filing fee,
inclusive of a civil case processing fee and technology surcharge, if applicable, assessed in
accordance with § 8-15-11.
(b) If the plaintiff is filing a claim of appeal on a counterclaim, the plaintiff shall pay an
appeal filing fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00), inclusive of a civil case processing fee and
technology surcharge, if applicable, assessed in accordance with § 8-15-11.
(c) Notwithstanding the foregoing, in cases in which the plaintiff is the purchaser of a
consumer product seeking to recover damages against the seller and/or manufacturer of that
product, if the defendant is defaulted for failure to answer and defend the claim, the judgment of
the district court shall be final. In such event, the defendant shall be deemed to have forfeited all
rights to appeal and shall not be entitled to a trial de novo in superior court.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001495
========
LC001495 - Page 2 of 3